Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2607
Records; inspection.

Every record required to be maintained pursuant to sections 60-2602 to 60-2604 shall be open to inspection by any designated peace officer or investigator employed by the board for inspection during regular business hours. Such inspection may include examination of the subject premises and contents for the purpose of determining the accuracy of the required records.

Laws 1983, LB 234, § 27.